Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.388

Washington state flag account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1468-S.SL) ***

The Washington state flag account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW 43.07.370(2)(e) must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purpose of donating Washington state flags to Washington state military personnel. Only the secretary of state or the secretary of state's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2009 c 71 s 2.]